Washington statutes.
RCW 43.34.100

Memorial to commemorate global war on terror.

Any memorial established on capitol campus to commemorate the global war on terror must recognize service members who died in Operation Iraqi Freedom, Operation Enduring Freedom, and Operation New Dawn, which are classified under the umbrella term global war on terror. Any such memorial must include a component designed to reflect on the great number of active duty service members and veterans who have died by suicide after serving in these wars. The design of such a memorial must serve to honor those who are lost and provide a sacred space for healing and reflection for veterans and military families.

[ 2022 c 191 s 12.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2022 c 191: See note following RCW 43.60A.260.